test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-juurd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - juurd contract stem ajatus: # Noun - full paradigm
     juurd+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: juurd
     juurd+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: jurddi
     juurd+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: jurddi
     juurd+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: [jurddǥa, jurddja]
     juurd+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: jurddjest
     juurd+N+Sg+Com+Indef: jurddjin
     juurd+N+Ess+Indef: jurddjen
     juurd+N+Par+Indef: jurdded
     juurd+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [jurdditaa, jurdditää]
     juurd+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: jurddi
     juurd+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: jurddji
     juurd+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: jurddjid
     juurd+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: jurddjid
     juurd+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: jurddjin
     juurd+N+Pl+Com+Indef: jurddjivuiʹm
     juurd+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [jurddjitaa, jurddjitää]
